Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 9 Probate Courts

8-9-1, 8-9-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 1; G.L., ch. 568, § 7; P.L. 1955, ch. 3499, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

8-9-1

, 8-9-2; Repealed by P.L. 1971, ch. 240, § 1.

8-9-2.1.
Probate judges — Qualifications.

No person shall be eligible to serve as a probate judge in any city or town in this state unless he or she has been admitted to practice as an attorney before the Rhode Island supreme court and has been engaged in the active practice of law in this state. Each city or town may establish additional standards as may be determined by city or town ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 240, § 2.

8-9-2.2.
New Shoreham town council as probate court.

The town council of the town of New Shoreham may act as a probate court within its town; the major part of the members elected constitutes a quorum for doing business, and the major part of those present at any legal meeting may decide upon any matter before them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 219, § 1.

8-9-2.3.
Probate judge in town where council sits as probate court.

In any town where the town council regularly sits as the probate court, the town council may appoint annually a member of the bar of the state of Rhode Island to be available to sit as judge of the probate court and may fill any vacancy occurring in the office of that appointee. Whenever a party to any contested matter in the probate court of the town shall so request, the town council acting as the probate court of the town shall designate the appointee to sit as a judge of the probate court to hear and determine that particular contested probate matter and the request and designation shall be recorded in the records of the probate court, and thereupon the appointee shall have the power and be subjected to the duties of the probate court with respect to the matter; provided, however, that if the appointee is a party to or interested in the matter, or is unable to perform his or her duties, no such designation shall be made. The probate clerk shall attend all hearings and record all proceedings before the appointee. The appointee shall not be entitled to any fees of the probate court, and the probate court shall be entitled to the same fees as if the designation had not been made. The appointee shall be entitled to receive from the town such compensation as it may allow.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 219, § 1.

8-9-3.
Providence probate court.

The probate court of the city of Providence shall be the probate court for the city.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 2; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-3

.

8-9-4.
Election and powers of probate judge.

The town council of any town which may, at the regular meeting of the town, have delegated to its town council such power, shall elect a judge of probate for the town, and any city council or any town may at the election of town officers elect a judge of probate for the city or town; and the judge of probate, upon being engaged, shall, instead of the town council, have the power and be subject to the duties of a probate court, and be entitled to the fees of the court and such salary, in addition to or instead of such fees, to be received of the city or town, as the city or town may allow.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 3; P.L. 1928, ch. 1233, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-4

.

8-9-5.
Disqualification or inability of probate judge.

Unless otherwise provided, whenever the judge of probate in any city or town is a party or is interested in any case arising in his or her town, or is absent or unable to perform his or her duties, the town council of the town shall perform those duties in the same manner as if no judge of probate had been elected; provided, however, that whenever the judge of probate of the town of Warren is a party or is interested in any proceeding about to be heard in his or her court, or is absent or unable to perform his or her duties, or there is a vacancy in the office, his or her duties shall be temporarily performed by the town solicitor of the town; and the fact of the interest, absence, inability, or vacancy shall be rendered in the records of the court; provided, however, that whenever the judge of probate of the city of Newport or the town of Cumberland or Smithfield is a party or is interested in any proceeding about to be heard in his or her court, or is absent or unable to perform his or her duties, or there is a vacancy in the office, his or her duties shall be temporarily performed by the municipal court judge, if available, if not then the city solicitor of the city of Newport or by the town solicitor of the towns of Cumberland or Smithfield, respectively; and the fact of the interest, absence, inability, or vacancy shall be recorded in the records of the court; provided, however, that whenever the judge of probate of the towns of Hopkinton or West Greenwich is a party or is interested in any proceeding about to be heard in his or her court, or is absent or unable to perform his or her duties, or there is a vacancy in the office, his or her duties shall be temporarily performed by one or more deputy probate judges to be elected by the town council of the towns of Hopkinton and West Greenwich, in the same manner as prescribed for the election of the probate judge in §

8-9-4

, the deputy probate judge(s) to have the same powers and duties as the probate judge and be entitled to the fees of the court as the towns may allow; provided, further, however, that no judge of probate in any city or town shall be permitted to practice or enter his or her appearance or act in any capacity as an attorney in any case before the probate court in his or her city or town.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 3; P.L. 1928, ch. 1233, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 3; P.L. 1948, ch. 2002, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-5

; P.L. 1961, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 613, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 76, § 1.

8-9-6.
Town or city clerk as clerk of court.

The town or city clerk of each town and city, unless special provision is made by law or charter to the contrary, shall be the clerk of the probate court of the town or city.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-6

.

8-9-7.
Duties of probate clerk.

The probate clerk shall attend the meetings of the probate court and shall record its proceedings and also all wills, administrations, inventories, accounts, decrees, orders, determinations, and other writings, which shall be made, granted, or decreed upon by the probate court of the town or city, and shall have the custody and safekeeping of the seal of the court and of all the books and papers belonging to the probate office, and of any stenographic or electronic recording of any probate court proceedings made by the probate clerk, and shall not act as attorney before the court of which he or she is clerk. Provided, that the probate clerk shall be required to retain stenographic and electronic recordings of any probate court proceedings only for one year from the date of the hearing.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-7

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 3.

8-9-8.
Clerk pro tempore in absence of probate clerk.

Whenever the clerk of any probate court shall not appear at the time and place appointed for the meeting of the court, the court may appoint a clerk for the time being, who, after being duly sworn, shall perform all the duties, exercise all the powers, enjoy all the emoluments, and be subject to all the requirements granted to or conferred on or required of clerks of probate courts.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, ch. 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 306, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 357, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 568, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-8

.

8-9-9.
General probate jurisdiction.

Every probate court shall have jurisdiction in the town or city in which it is established of the probate of wills; the granting of administration, the appointment of custodians, of administrators, of guardians of persons and estates, or of persons only or of estates only, and of conservators; the accepting and allowing of bonds, inventories, and accounts of executors, administrators, and guardians; the granting of leave to sell at public or private sale, or to mortgage property, as hereinafter provided; of the making of partition of the real estate of deceased persons; of the adoption of persons eighteen (18) years of age or older; of change of names of persons; of the removal or filling of a vacancy of a trustee of any trust established under a will, or the termination of such trust; of setting off and allowing real estate and personal property to widows and surviving husbands; and of all other matters now within the jurisdiction of probate courts. The court shall have power to accept the resignation of, or to remove, any custodian, executor, administrator, or guardian, or any other person appointed by the court, and also power to do and transact all matters and things incidental to the jurisdiction and powers vested in probate courts by law. Every probate court shall have the power to follow the course of equity insofar as necessary to fulfill the mandates of title 33 of the General Laws, specifically: the replacement, removal, or filling of any vacancy of any trustee under a trust established under a will; or tax minimization or estate planning under §

33-15-37.1

. The jurisdiction assumed in any case by the court, so far as it depends on the place of residence of a person, shall not be contested in any suit or proceedings except in the original case or on appeal therein or when the want of jurisdiction appears on the record.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 721; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-9

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 3.

Partition.

The probate court has no statutory authority to partition by sale a ward’s life tenancy and an heir’s remainder interest. De Lisi v. Caito, 463 A.2d 167,

1983 R.I. LEXIS 1020

(R.I. 1983).

8-9-10.
Appointment and supervision of temporary custodians of decedents’ estates.

Every probate court may appoint any suitable person or persons as custodian or custodians to have the charge and care of the real and personal property of deceased persons, the settlement of whose estates is within the jurisdiction of the court, until letters testamentary or of administration are granted; the court may require the custodians to give bond to the court, with or without surety or sureties, in its discretion; the court may also, in its discretion, authorize the custodians to sell any property that may come to their possession by virtue of the appointment, and to take any other action that the court may direct. The custodians shall in all things be subject to the control of the court and act under its direction, and shall receive a reasonable compensation out of the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 722; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 2; GL. 1938, ch. 569, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-10

; P.L. 2000, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 136, § 1.

8-9-11.
Power to take probate and grant administration of decedents’ estates.

The probate court of any town or city shall take the probate of wills and grant administration on the estate of deceased persons who, at the time of their decease, were inhabitants of or residents in the town or city, and of other persons, not having any residence in this state, who die leaving rights, credits, or estates, real or personal, within the town or city; provided, that the first probate of the will, and the first grant of administration on the estate, of any deceased person who, at the time of his decease, was not an inhabitant of or resident within this state, shall bar any other probate or grant of administration, although the deceased person may have left rights, credits, or estates, real or personal, in any other town or city in this state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 723; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-11

.

8-9-12.
Payment of legacies.

Probate courts may determine all questions as to the payments of legacies by executors and administrators with the will annexed and may allow such payments in the accounts of executors and administrators.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 724; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-12

.

8-9-13.
Revocation or modification of warrants and commissions.

Any warrant or commission for the appraisement of an estate, for examining claims against the estate of a deceased person, for the partition of real estate, or for the assignment of dower or other interest in real estate may be revoked by the court for sufficient cause; and the court may thereupon issue a new warrant or commission, or proceed otherwise, as the circumstances of the case shall require, or in the case of death, disability, or resignation of one or more of the appointees may supply vacancies occasioned thereby in such manner as the court shall deem best.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 725; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-13

.

8-9-14.
Revocation or modification of orders or decrees.

Any probate court may modify or revoke any order or decree made by it on an uncontested application before appeal therefrom, or, if no appeal is taken, before the time for taking an appeal has expired, and, if made in reference to the settlement of any estate, also before the final settlement thereof, upon the written application of any person interested therein, and after notice of the time and place of hearing thereon appointed by the court, given in the manner prescribed by it, to the person having charge of the estate and to all other interested parties; and upon any modification or revocation, there shall be the same right of and time for appeal as in case of any other order or decree.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 726; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-14

.

8-9-15.
Annulment of probate of will.

When it shall appear to a probate court, pending proceedings before it for the settlement of an estate as a testate estate, that the will under which the proceedings were had has been revoked by the testator, the court shall have power to annul any order or decree proving the will so revoked and any other order or decree made by the court in the settlement of the estate under the will. The court shall have power to proceed with the settlement of the estate under a subsequent will, if there is one; or, if there is none, to grant administration on the estate and proceed with the settlement thereof as an intestate estate, after such notice to all parties in interest as the court shall order; but the preceding executor or administrator shall not be personally liable for any thing done by him or her in good faith and in the line of his or her duties before the decree of annulment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 727; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-15

.

8-9-16.
Confirmation of prior acts and proceedings.

When the validity of an act or proceeding of a probate court, or of a person acting as executor, administrator, or guardian, is called in question by reason of an alleged irregularity, defective notice, or want or improper exercise of authority, any party interested in or affected by the act or proceeding may apply to the probate court having jurisdiction of the subject matter in respect to which the act or proceeding has been had; and the court, after such notice as it may order to all parties interested, may hear and determine the matter and confirm the act or proceeding, in whole or in part, and may authorize and empower the executor, administrator, guardian, or any successor, or other person who may be legally appointed to act in the same capacity, to confirm the act or proceeding and to execute and deliver such deeds, releases, conveyances, and other instruments as may be found necessary for that purpose; but no act or proceeding shall be confirmed which the court might not have authorized in the first instance upon due proceedings.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 728; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-16

.

8-9-17.
Power to summon and receive evidence.

Any probate court may require the attendance of any party or person, whom it may see fit to examine or cause to be examined in any proceeding pending in the court, and may examine or cause to be examined on oath parties and witnesses, either orally or on written interrogatories or both, or may receive their affidavits and may require any writings or other evidence pertinent in such proceedings to be produced before itself or otherwise, and may issue writs of subpoena ad testificandum, and of subpoena duces tecum.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 729; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-17

.

8-9-17.1.
Subpoenas issued by other officials.

Justices of the peace and notaries public may issue subpoenas to witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum in any case pending before any probate court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 316, § 1.

8-9-18.
Judicial aid in taking possession of property of estates.

If any person has or is suspected of having under his or her control any property or documents belonging to the estate of a deceased person or person under guardianship, or any thing which may tend to disclose the condition of the estate, and on demand therefor by the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or custodian refuses to deliver them to him or her without legal justification for the refusal; or if the person claims to have a lien thereon and refuses to disclose the amount and particulars of his or her claim; or if any person is suspected of having concealed, embezzled, or conveyed away any of the personal estate of the deceased person or ward, the probate court may, upon the written application of the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or custodian or any other party in interest, cite the person to appear before the court, and may examine him or her on oath concerning the matters complained of; and if he or she refuses to appear or to answer the interrogatories put to him or her by the court, it may adjudge him or her in contempt and may commit him or her therefor to the adult correctional institutions until he or she shall submit to the order of the court or be legally discharged. The person so examined shall not be excused from answering any question on the ground that his or her answer will tend to criminate him or her, but his or her answer shall not be used as evidence against him or her in any criminal prosecution except for perjury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 730; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-18

.

8-9-19.
Expense of commitment for failure to deliver property of estate.

The probate court shall ascertain the expenses occasioned by commitment as provided in §

8-9-18

, and the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or custodian of the estate shall pay the expenses; and if the party paying the expenses shall afterwards recover judgment against the person committed, for any property withheld by him or her belonging to the estate, those expenses, as ascertained by the probate court, shall be taxed as part of the costs of the suit; or if the person after being imprisoned shall, without suit, surrender any effects belonging to the estate withheld by him or her, the executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or custodian may recover from him or her the amount of the expenses.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 731; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-19

.

8-9-20.
Right to counsel of person suspected of withholding property.

Upon the examination as provided in §

8-9-18

, the person suspected may have counsel, who may examine and cross-examine him or her as to any matter deemed material arising in the course of the investigation.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 732; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-20

.

8-9-21.
Contempt of court — Habeas corpus.

Every probate court may punish any contempt of its authority by fine or imprisonment or both. Every probate court may issue writs of habeas corpus to bring before it any person in jail to be examined as a witness in any suit or proceeding pending in the court, that the ends of justice may be attained, and for no other purpose.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 733; G.L. 1909, ch. 307, § 13; P.L. 1910, ch. 585, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 358, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 569, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

8-9-21

.

8-9-22.
Presumption of death from sea disaster.

If a person shall be lost in a sea disaster, the subject of which has been investigated by the United States Navy, the United States Coast Guard, or a similar agency in a foreign country, and after due and diligent search there was a finding by the Navy, Coast Guard, or similar agency that the person was lost in a sea disaster which finding is supported by testimony given by an eyewitness to the disaster, then any heir of the person may, after six (6) months of the date of the finding by the Navy, Coast Guard, or similar agency, produce the finding in the appropriate probate court and it shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the death of the person so as to allow for administration of his estate. Should more than one person be lost in the sea disaster, the Navy or Coast Guard or similar agency’s finding shall be prima facie evidence of death even if not supported by eyewitness testimony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 139, § 1.

8-9-23.
Missing person — Presumption of death.

If a resident of this state has disappeared and has been absent from his or her usual place of residence and his or her whereabouts has been unknown for more than four (4) years, it shall be prima facie evidence that the person is dead so as to allow for the administration of his or her estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 139, § 1.